Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXI Debtor-Creditor Relations
CHAPTER 376 Statutory Liens
376.400.
Lien of keeper of livery stable or agister for care of livestock — Sale of livestock cared for — Conditions.

Any owner or keeper of a livery stable or other business providing for the care of animals, and a person feeding, grazing, or caring for any animal for compensation, shall, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, have a lien for one (1) year upon the animal placed in the stable, kennel, or similar facility, or put out to be fed or grazed by the owner, for his or her reasonable charges for keeping, caring for, feeding, and grazing the animal. The lien shall attach whether the animal is merely temporarily lodged, fed, grazed, and cared for, or is placed at the stable or other place or pasture for regular board. The lien shall take priority over a lien created pursuant to KRS 376.420(1).

Any person who has agreed to provide feed or care for an animal for compensation may, in lieu of the lien provided for in subsection (1) of this section, cause the animal to be sold if:

The owner of the animal is at least forty-five (45) days in arrears on his or her payment for the care and feeding of the animal, and the animal is in the possession of the person or business providing for the care of the animal;

The proposed sale is published in one (1) or more newspapers and qualified pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, with a publication area in the locale where the person providing care for the animal is located and the locale where the owner of the animal was last known to reside; and

Written notice of the sale is sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, or registered mail, to the owner of the animal, addressed to such person at his or her last known address, and to all lien holders of record with the Kentucky Secretary of State and the local county clerk’s office, at least ten (10) days before the sale is conducted. The written notice shall include:

The amount due the person or business providing care for the animal;

The date, time, and location of the sale; and

A statement that the sale proceeds shall be disbursed as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

If a sale is conducted as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the proceeds of the sale shall be disbursed in the following order:

Payment for costs associated with the sale;

Payment of amounts due to the person or business providing for the care and feeding of the animal;

Payment to lien holders and creditors pursuant to a court order; and

The remainder, if any, held for the owner for a period of twelve (12) months and, if not claimed at that time, then paid into the district school fund.

History.

2500: amend. Acts 1984, ch. 231, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 28, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2009, ch. 91, § 1, effective June 25, 2009.

376.410.
Enforcement of lien for care of livestock.

Any person in whose favor a lien provided for in KRS

376.400

exists may, before the District Court of the county where the cattle were fed or grazed, by himself or agent, make affidavit of the amount due him and in arrears for keeping and caring for the cattle, and describing as nearly as possible the cattle so kept by him. The court shall then issue a warrant, directed to the sheriff or any constable or town marshal of the county, authorizing him to levy upon and seize the cattle for the amount due, with interest and costs. If the cattle are removed with the consent and from the custody of the livery stable keeper or the person feeding or grazing them, the lien shall not continue longer than one (1) year from and after the removal, nor shall the lien in case of such removal be valid against a bona fide purchaser without notice at any time after the removal. The warrant may be issued to a county other than that in which the cattle were fed or grazed, and the lien may also be enforced by action as in the case of other liens.

History.

2501, 2502: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 289, effective January 2, 1978; 1984, ch. 231, § 2, effective July 13, 1984.

376.420.
Lien for service fee of stallion, jack, or bull — Enforcement of lien.

Any licensed keeper of a stallion, jack, or bull shall have a lien for the payment of the service fee upon the get of the stallion, jack, or bull, for one (1) year after the birth of the progeny. However, a lien created pursuant to KRS

376.400

shall take priority over a lien created pursuant to this subsection.

This lien may be enforced by action as in cases of other liens, or by warrant as permitted in the case of the enforcement of the lien of the keeper of a livery stable or an agister.

History.

2503, 2504; 1996, ch. 28, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

376.430.
Lien on radios, phonographs and other electrical or electronic devices, for repair.

All persons, firms and corporations engaged in the business of repairing radios, phonographs, combinations thereof, automatic music instruments, refrigerators, televisions, electrical or electronic recording devices, and any and all portable electrical or electronic instruments or appliances shall have a lien upon such articles and appliances for the agreed or reasonable charge for parts, supplies, accessories and labor performed in their repair, said lien to attach upon completion of such repairs. The lien may be enforced by legal action or as hereafter provided.

After completion of repairs, the owner shall be notified thereof by certified mail, return receipt requested or by registered mail, and if the repaired article be not removed and all charges paid within thirty (30) days after giving the notice, the person, firm or corporation making such repairs may hold such repaired articles and sell same at public or bona fide private sale to pay all agreed or reasonable charges, including charges for storage after notice of completion of repairs, and expenses incidental to advertisement and sale, accounting to the owner for any excess of charges and expenses.

Before any sale of the repaired article, the person, firm or corporation making the repairs shall notify the owner of the article of the time and place of the sale. The notice may be served by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by registered mail directed to the owner’s last known address, or, if the owner or his address is unknown, notice of the sale shall be published pursuant to KRS Chapter 424.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 30; 1966, ch. 239, § 216; 1974, ch. 315, § 82; 1988, ch. 326, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

376.435.
Lien on die, mold, form, or pattern — Respective rights of molder and customer.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Customer” means any person who causes a molder to fabricate, cast, or otherwise make a die, mold, form, or pattern, or who provides a molder with a die, mold, form, or pattern, to manufacture, assemble, cast, fabricate, or otherwise make a product for a customer; and

“Molder” means any person who fabricates, casts, or otherwise makes or uses a die, mold, form, or pattern for the purpose of manufacturing, assembling, casting, fabricating, or otherwise making a product for a customer. “Molder” includes, but is not limited to, a tool or die maker.

In the absence of any agreement to the contrary, a customer shall have all rights and title to any die, mold, form, or pattern in the possession of a molder.

If a customer does not claim possession from a molder of a die, mold, form, or pattern, all rights and title to any die, mold, form, or pattern shall be transferred by operation of law to the molder for the purpose of destroying or otherwise disposing of the die, mold, form, or pattern, consistent with this subsection.

If a molder chooses to have all rights and title to any die, mold, form, or pattern transferred to the molder by operation of law, the molder shall send written notice by registered mail to the chief executive officer of the customer or, if the customer is not a business entity, to the customer, at the customer’s last known address. The written notice shall indicate that the molder intends to terminate the customer’s rights and title by having the rights and title transferred to the molder by operation of law under this section. The notice shall include a statement of the customer’s rights set forth in paragraph (d) of this subsection.

If a customer does not respond in person or by mail to claim possession of a particular die, mold, form, or pattern within one hundred twenty (120) days following the date that the notice was mailed, or does not make contractual arrangements with the molder for storage of the die, mold, form, or pattern, all rights and title of the customer, except patents and copyrights, shall transfer by operation of law to the molder. Thereafter, the molder may destroy or otherwise dispose of the particular die, mold, form, or pattern as the molder’s own property without any risk of liability to the customer.

This section shall not be construed in any manner to affect any right of the customer under federal patent or copyright law or federal law pertaining to unfair competition.

A molder shall have a lien, dependent on possession, on all dies, molds, forms, or patterns in his hands and that belong to a customer, for the balance due him from the customer for any manufacturing or fabrication work, and in the value of all material related to the work. The molder may retain possession of the die, mold, form, or pattern until the charges are paid.

Before enforcing a lien, a molder shall give notice in writing to the customer, whether delivered personally or sent by registered mail to the last known address of the customer. The notice shall state that a lien is claimed for the damages set forth in or attached to the writing for manufacturing or fabrication work contracted or performed for the customer. The notice shall also include a demand for payment.

If the molder has not been paid the amount due within sixty (60) days after the notice has been received by the customer, as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the molder may sell the die, mold, form, or pattern at a public auction.

Before a molder may sell the die, mold, form, or pattern, the molder shall notify the customer by registered mail, return receipt requested. The notice shall include:

The molder’s intention to sell the die, mold, form, or pattern thirty (30) days after the customer’s receipt of the notice;

A description of the die, mold, form, or pattern to be sold;

The time and place of the sale; and

An itemized statement for the amount due.

If there is not a return of the receipt of the mailing or if the postal service returns the notice as being nondeliverable, the molder shall publish the notice of the molder’s intention to sell the die, mold, form, or pattern in a newspaper of general circulation in the customer’s last known place of business. The notice shall include a description of the die, mold, form, or pattern.

If the sale is for a sum greater than the amount of the lien, the excess shall be paid to any prior lienholder known to the molder at the time of the sale and any remainder shall be paid to the customer, if the customer’s address is known, or the Kentucky State Treasurer for deposit in the general fund if the customer’s address is unknown to the molder at the time of the sale.

A molder shall not conduct a sale if the sale violates any right of a customer under federal patent or copyright law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 435, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

376.440.
Lien on equipment, machinery and motors for work and supplies — Filing of lien statement.

Any person engaged in the business of selling, repairing, or furnishing accessories, or supplies for any kind of equipment or machinery, including motors, shall have a lien on the equipment, machine, machinery, or motor, for the reasonable or agreed charges for repairs, work done, accessories, parts, and supplies furnished for the equipment, machine, machinery, or motor until the reasonable or agreed charge therefor has been paid. The lien shall not be lost by the removal of the equipment, machine, machinery or motor from the premises of the person performing labor, repairing, or furnishing accessories, parts or supplies therefor, if the lien shall be asserted within three (3) months by filing in the office of the county clerk a statement showing the amount and cost of materials furnished or labor performed on the equipment, machine, machinery, or motor. This statement shall be filed in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the owner of the equipment, machine, machinery, or motor resides, unless such owner be a nonresident, in which event the lien statement shall be filed in the office of the county clerk of the county in which such equipment, machine, machinery, or motor is at the time being kept or used.

The lien provided for in this section shall attach regardless of whether or not the equipment, machine, machinery, motor, or motors, are ever upon the premises of or in the possession of the person making the repairs, furnishing the parts, or the supplies for such repairs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 102, § 1, effective June 17, 1954; 1978, ch. 384, § 505, effective June 17, 1978.

376.445.
Contents of lien statement — Indorsement and filing by county clerk — Fee.

The lien statement referred to in KRS

376.440

shall be construed to mean a statement in writing in which is stated the amount due the claimant, with all just credits and setoffs known to him, together with a description of the property intended to be covered by the lien sufficiently accurate to identify it and the name of the owner. This statement shall be subscribed and sworn to by the person claiming the lien or by someone in his behalf.

The county clerk shall endorse upon each statement the date of its filing, and shall make an abstract of the statement in a book to be kept by him for that purpose, properly endorsed and indexed, containing the date of filing, the name of the person seeking to enforce the lien, the amount claimed, the name of the person against whose property the lien is filed, and a description of the property charged with the lien. The clerk shall receive a fee as provided for in KRS

64.012

from the person filing the statement as full compensation, which shall be taxed and collected as other costs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 102, § 2, effective June 17, 1954; 1978, ch. 84, § 22, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 506, effective June 17, 1978.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section was amended by two 1978 acts which do not appear to be in conflict and which have been compiled together.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

See note to KRS

376.450

. Corbin Deposit Bank v. King (1964), 384 S.W.2d 302, 1964

Ky. LEXIS 83

.

376.450.
Lien inferior to mortgage or sale unless statement filed.

The lien shall not take precedence over a mortgage or bona fide sale and delivery for value without notice, unless the person claiming the prior lien shall, before the recording of the mortgage, or before sale and delivery, file in the office of the county clerk a statement showing that he has furnished or expects to furnish labor, or materials, or parts, or supplies, and the amount in full thereof. The lien shall not, as against the holder of a mortgage, or a purchaser for value, exceed the amount of the lien claimed, as set forth in the statement. The statement shall in all other respects be in the form provided in KRS

376.445

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 102, § 3, effective June 17, 1954; 1978, ch. 384, § 507, effective June 17, 1978.

376.455.
Sale of equipment, machinery or motor to pay charges.

Any equipment, machine, machinery, motor or motors remaining in the possession of a person who has made repairs, furnished parts, performed labor, or furnished accessories or supplies for the equipment, machine, machinery, motor, or motors, for more than thirty (30) days, may be sold to pay the charges. The proposed sale shall be advertised by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. The owner of the equipment, machine, machinery, motor or motors, shall be served with written notice of such proposed sale at least two (2) weeks before the date of such sale. The notice may be in writing addressed to the owner at his last known address and sent by registered United States mail, postage prepaid. Such written notice may be served upon the owner in any other mode generally recognized by the laws and practice before courts in this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 102, § 4; 1966, ch. 239, § 217.

376.460.
Attorney’s lien.

Each attorney shall have a lien upon all claims, except those of the state, put into his hands for suit or collection or upon which suit has been instituted, for the amount of any fee agreed upon by the parties or, in the absence of such agreement, for a reasonable fee. If the action is prosecuted to a recovery of money or property, the attorney shall have a lien upon the judgment recovered, legal costs excepted, for his fee. If the records show the name of the attorney, the defendant shall be deemed to have notice of the lien. If the parties in good faith and before judgment compromise or settle their controversy without the payment of money or other thing of value, the attorney for the plaintiff shall have no claim against the defendant for any part of his fee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 58, § 9.

376.470.
Veterinarian’s lien.

Any licensed veterinarian who performs professional services for an animal, by contract with, or by the written consent of, the owner or authorized agent shall have a lien on the animal to secure the cost of the service provided.

The priority among veterinarian’s liens filed under this section shall be according to the first lien filed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 452, § 2, effective July 13, 1990.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Schneiter, Equine Statutory Liens, Vol. 67, No. 4, July 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 23.

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Ellerman & Linneman, A Survey of Kentucky Commercial Law., 31 N. Ky. L. Rev. 201 (2004).

376.475.
Filing requirement — Indexing — Dissolution for nonenforcement.

Any lien provided for in KRS

376.470

shall be dissolved unless the claimant, within six (6) months after he ceases to provide services for the animal, files in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the animal is located, a statement of the amount due him, together with a description of the animal intended to be covered by the lien sufficiently accurate to identify it, the name of the owner, and whether the services were furnished by contract or written consent of the owner or agent. This statement shall be subscribed and sworn to by the person claiming the lien or by someone in his behalf. The claimant shall send by regular mail a copy of the statement to the owner at his last known address within seven (7) days of filing the statement with the county clerk. Any lien provided for in KRS

376.470

shall be dissolved if a copy of the statement is not sent to the property owner as provided in this subsection.

The county clerk shall endorse upon each statement the date of its filing, and shall make an abstract of the statement in a book to be kept by him for that purpose, properly endorsed and indexed, containing the date of filing, the name of the person seeking to enforce the lien, the amount claimed, the name of the person against whose animal the lien is filed, and a description of the animal charged with the lien. The clerk shall receive a fee pursuant to KRS

64.012

from the person filing the statement as full compensation, which shall be taxed and collected as other costs.

Any lien created under this section shall be dissolved unless an action is brought to enforce the lien within twelve (12) months from the day of filing the statement in the clerk’s office as required by subsection (1) of this section. If the lienholder complies with all filing requirements under this section, and does so within the time herein fixed, his lien shall be valid and effective against any creditor of, or bona fide or other purchaser from, the owner of the animal, except as provided in KRS 257.105(2).

The procedure to enforce a lien under KRS

376.470

shall be as provided in KRS

376.110

,

376.120

, and

376.130

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 452, § 3, effective July 13, 1990.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Ellerman & Linneman, A Survey of Kentucky Commercial Law., 31 N. Ky. L. Rev. 201 (2004).

376.480.
Lien for rent due on space for parking abandoned house trailer or mobile home — Sale of abandoned property.

Any owner of real property who rents space on which a house trailer or mobile home is parked shall have a lien for rent due on any house trailer or mobile home, its contents, and other personalty abandoned by the occupant on the landowner’s property for rent due, reasonable storage, cleanup costs, and utilities furnished to the unit and paid for by the landowner.

If, after a period of sixty (60) days, the rent, reasonable storage, cleanup costs, and utilities have not been paid, the house trailer or mobile home, its contents, and other personalty abandoned by the occupant may be sold to pay the rent, reasonable storage, cleanup costs, and utilities after the unit owner has been notified of the time and place of the sale, at the unit owner’s last known address. Notice shall be made by registered mail at least ten (10) days prior to the time of the sale. If there is a valid recorded lien against the property to be sold, the landowner shall notify the lienholder of the time and place of sale by registered mail at least ten (10) days prior to the time of the sale. If the proceeds of the sale are insufficient to pay the debt and costs of sale, the sale and collection of proceeds shall not constitute a waiver or release of responsibility for payment of the debt owed by the unit owner. This lien shall be subject to prior recorded liens and property taxes.

Any money obtained in excess of the sale costs, taxes, and liens shall be paid by the seller to the unit owner; and if the unit owner cannot be located, the excess money shall escheat to the state pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 393.

Before the sale, the landowner shall advertise a description of the property to be sold and the time and place of sale for three (3) consecutive publishing periods in a local newspaper distributed in the county where the property is located.

The sale may be by written bids or by auction, or both, and the seller may bid on the property. The sale shall be to the highest bidder.

The house trailer or mobile home shall be transferred to the purchaser in the county where the sale is conducted upon an affidavit being filed by the seller stating that the provisions of this section have been met, listing the sale price, and containing any other information that may be required by the state or county.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 275, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

376.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (2) of KRS

376.050

shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

376.060

or

376.070

shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

2467, 2467a-2, 2467b-4: amend. Acts 1992, ch. 463, § 43, effective July 14, 1992.